California statutes. Water Code
Two copies of the assessment roll as finally fixed and approved by the adjustment board shall be certified by the secretary of the adjustment board and transmitted to the board. The board shall file one copy in its records and shall immediately transmit to the county treasurer of each affected county that portion of the roll relating to land in that county, together with a copy of the order of approval of the assessment roll by the adjustment board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 121.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

46257.

The assessment roll as approved by the adjustment board shall be conclusive evidence before any court or tribunal that the assessment has been made and levied according to law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Lien of Assessment [46280. - 46281.]

46280.

When the secretary of the board files the certificates as provided for by Section 46209, or if objections are filed, when the board files with the county treasurer of an affected county the assessment roll as finally approved by the adjustment board, the charges assessed thereby upon the several tracts of land in the county shall constitute a lien thereon which is prior to all other liens except state, county, and municipal taxes, and assessments or taxes levied or assessed by or under statutory authority. The filing in either case imparts notice to all persons.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

46281.

Where bonds of a district have been issued upon any assessment, no act or conduct on the part of the board or any officer shall invalidate the assessment after it has become a lien.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Additional Units of Project [46305. - 46305.]

46305.

Upon adoption of a resolution by the board to construct additional units pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 42225), Chapter 1, Part 5 of this division, the same proceedings for levying, approving, and collecting an assessment to meet the cost of the unit or units to be constructed shall be had as provided in this chapter for an assessment to meet the cost of the unit or units first constructed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 122.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Reapportionment of Assessments [46325. - 46331.]

46325.

When any tract of land upon which any assessment provided for by this division has been levied is subdivided into smaller parcels the board shall, upon its own motion or upon written application therefor signed by all of the landowners of record within the subdivided tract, reapportion the assessment upon such tract in such manner as will, in the judgment of the board, charge each of the smaller parcels with a just portion of the assessment. Such reapportionment shall be entered in the minutes of the board and, upon such entry, shall then become final. If an application for reapportionment is signed by less than all of the landowners within the subdivided tract, or if
 reapportionment is upon motion of the board, the board may make such reapportionment only after a hearing for which notice to all persons interested shall have been given in the manner prescribed by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1086.)
-------------------------------------------

46326.

Supplementary assessment rolls showing the reapportionments shall be made separately for land lying within different counties.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

46328.

The board shall file with the treasurer of each county in which any portion of the tract so subdivided is situated, the supplementary assessment roll relating to the land in that county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 123.5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

46329.

After the supplementary assessment rolls have been filed the assessment is an assessment upon each of the smaller parcels in accordance with the reapportionment and not an assessment upon the tract as a whole.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

46330.

The supplementary assessment rolls are a part of and amendatory of the assessment rolls theretofore filed for all purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

46331.

The reapportionment shall in nowise affect the assessment except as to the land included in the supplementary assessment rolls.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Reassessment of Cost [46355. - 46356.]

46355.

At any time after the commissioners have assessed the cost of the project upon the benefited land within the district and the costs of the portion of the project used for the generation of electric energy, the board may direct the commissioners to reassess the costs of the project upon the benefited land. At the expiration of five years after the commissioners have originally assessed the cost of the project upon the benefited land within the district and the costs of the portion of the project used for the generation of electric energy, and thereafter at any
 time not less than five years after the next previous reassessment, the board, upon petition of holders of title to 10 percent of the land, shall direct the commissioners to reassess the costs of the project upon the benefited land.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 124.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

46356.

The reassessment of costs of the project shall be made in the same manner as provided in this chapter for the original assessment of costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Interim Project Assessments [46375. - 46382.]

46375.

At any time after a district project is adopted, as provided in Part 5 (commencing with Section 42200) of this division, and before the original assessment to finance the project has become a lien, as provided in Section 46280, the board may levy one or more interim project assessments pursuant to this part for the purpose of paying costs of the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 181.)
-------------------------------------------

46376.

Each interim project assessment shall be levied in an equal amount upon each acre of land in the district. The total amount of all interim project assessments for any district project shall not exceed five dollars ($5) per acre.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 105.)
-------------------------------------------

46377.

The board may by resolution levy an interim project assessment, if in its judgment the levy is in the best interests of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1020, Sec. 125.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

46378.

Every interim project assessment is a lien upon the land affected until the full amount of the assessment is paid. The lien is prior to all other liens, except state, county and municipal taxes and assessments, or taxes levied or assessed by or under statutory authority. The interim project assessments shall bear interest at the rate of 7 percent per year and shall be collected in the same manner, together with the same penalties for delinquencies, as other assessments provided for in this division. Interest commences to run 30 days after filing of the assessment roll with the county treasurer of an affected county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1086.)
-------------------------------------------

46379.

The amount of any interim project assessment assessed against any tract of land in the district shall be credited against the original assessment to finance the project thereafter levied against said tract, and the amount of said original assessment to be collected shall be reduced accordingly.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 181.)
-------------------------------------------

46380.

If the amount of the interim project assessment or assessments credited with respect to any tract of land pursuant to Section 46379 exceeds the amount of the original assessment to finance the project with respect to said tract, said excess shall be credited against said interim project assessment or assessments, which, to that extent, shall cease to be a lien with respect to said tract. If the amount theretofore collected by the district on the interim project assessment or assessments with respect to any tract of land exceeds the amount of the original assessment with respect to said tract, such excess shall be a claim against and debt of the district, and the district
 shall issue a warrant in the amount of said excess to the then holder of title to said tract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 181.)
-------------------------------------------

46381.

A district may issue direct assessment warrants payable from the proceeds of an interim project assessment pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 45900) of Part 8 of this division, but such warrants shall be made payable not more than five years from the date of issuance and may be made subject to call or redemption prior to their stated maturity date or dates at such premium, if any, as the board may determine, and the aggregate face amount thereof shall not exceed seventy-five percent (75%) of the amount of the interim project assessment from which such warrants are payable, exclusive of interest and amounts paid prior to the issuance of such warrants on said
 interim project assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 181.)
-------------------------------------------

46382.

If there are no obligations outstanding which are secured by an interim project assessment, the board may, at any time and without notice or hearing, order that the uncalled balance of such interim project assessment be canceled and that the amount of the credit against the original assessment represented by such uncalled balance of said interim project assessment be annulled for each tract of land in the district. In such event, notwithstanding the provisions of Section 46379, the amount of said original assessment to be collected from each tract of land in the district shall be increased by the amount of the credit that was so annulled; provided, however, said amount
 shall be decreased by the amount of any payment made on the uncalled balance of said interim project assessment. Interest due on the recomputed collectible amount of said original assessment shall be computed as provided in Section 46671 or 47303 as the case may be.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1086.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Payment of Assessments [46500. - 46501.]

46500.

The assessment list of each county shall remain open for payment in the office of the county treasurer of the affected counties for a period of 30 days and shall continue to remain open thereafter until such time, if ever, as the board makes an order calling a special election for the issuance of bonds to be secured by the assessment or until such time as the board files with the county treasurer a resolution, adopted and approved in accordance with Section 45102, authorizing the issuance of bonds to be secured by the assessment. If the result of the election, if any is called, is that the proposal to issue bonds is defeated, or if no bonds are issued within six months
 after such a resolution has been so filed, the assessment list shall again become open.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1607.)
-------------------------------------------

46501.

During the time the assessment lists are open any person may pay to the county treasurer in lawful money of the United States or in warrants of the district all or any part of the charge assessed against any tract of land.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 821.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Additional Help for County Treasurer [46650. - 46650.]

46650.

The county treasurer of any affected county, during the time for the collection of the assessments of the district, may require the board to provide and pay for such additional help as may be required to care for the matters relating to the collection of the assessments of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Collection of Original Assessments [46670. - 46797.]



  ARTICLE 1. In General [46670. - 46675.]

46670.

At the end of 30 days, the county treasurer shall make return to the board of all assessments paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

46671.

All unpaid assessments bear interest at the rate of 8 percent per year. Interest commences to run 30 days after the assessment list is filed with the county treasurer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 830.)
-------------------------------------------

46672.

All unpaid assessments and accrued interest shall be collected by the county treasurers when and as called. The county treasurers shall hold the money collected to the credit of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

46673.

Unless bonds have been authorized as provided in this division, all payments of assessments shall be made in such amounts or installments and at such times as the board from time to time in its discretion may direct by order entered in its minutes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

46674.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 46675, in the event the cost of any unit is less than the funds collected therefor, the excess shall be held and used for the benefit of such unit only and shall be applied to the bond fund of such unit, and if there is no bond fund, the excess shall be applied to the operation of such unit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 821.)
-------------------------------------------

46675.

The board, pursuant to a resolution entered in its minutes, may distribute, among the landowners of the district, any funds in the treasury belonging to the district which were collected on an assessment on which no bonds are outstanding (or collected by way of interest or penalties on the assessment or by the rental, sale or redemption of delinquent land under the assessment) and which appear to the board to be greater than required to meet all obligations incurred or to be incurred for the purposes for which the assessment was levied, such distribution to the landowners to be made in the proportion that they were assessed on such assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 821.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Notice of Time for Payment [46695. - 46696.]

46695.

Upon making any order fixing and calling an installment or amount, the secretary shall also enter in the minutes of the board, and certify to each county treasurer for signature and mailing or publication in the affected counties, a notice in substantially the following form: 

(Name) water storage district. (Location of the principal place of business.) Notice is hereby given that at a meeting of the board of directors held on ____ an installment of ____ percent of assessment number ____ was ordered paid within 60 days from the date thereof to the respective county treasurers of
 the counties wherein lands of such district are situate. Any installment which shall remain unpaid on the (day fixed) will be delinquent, together with the accrued interest thereon, with 10 percent of such installment and interest added as penalty.

For any installment which remains unpaid after the date it becomes delinquent, the following procedure shall apply:

(a) Unless the assessments, penalties, and interest delinquent are paid by the date stated in a notice of sale, the delinquent property shall, on that date, be sold to the highest bidder for nonpayment of the delinquent assessments, penalties, and interest.

(b) Subsequent to the sale of the delinquent property to the highest bidder, the property may be redeemed by payment of the amount specified in Section 46786 of the Water Code and, if applicable, Section 46788.3 of the Water
 Code.

(c) The name, address, and telephone number of the official who will furnish all information concerning redemption is _______.

(d) After three years have elapsed from the date of sale of the delinquent property to the highest bidder, the right of redemption may be terminated upon execution and delivery to the district of a deed pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 46785) of Chapter 5 of Part 9 of Division 14 of the Water Code.(Signed)Treasurer of _______ County.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 793, Sec. 1.   Effective September 18, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

46696.

The notice shall be sent through the mail, addressed to each holder of title to land at the address shown on the county assessment roll, together with a statement showing the amount due for the applicable parcel or parcels. The notice shall also be published once a week for two consecutive weeks in each affected county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 793, Sec. 2.   Effective September 18, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Penalty for Delinquency [46710. - 46710.]

46710.

If any installment remains unpaid at the expiration of 60 days from the date of the order, it becomes delinquent, together with the accrued interest thereon, and a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the installment and interest shall be added and collected for the use of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Notice of Sale of Property [46730. - 46731.]

46730.

Immediately after the installment has become delinquent, the county treasurer shall prepare and publish once a week for two consecutive weeks in each affected county in one notice a list of all delinquencies in the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

46731.

The notice shall contain all the following:

(a) A description of the property assessed.

(b) The name of the person to whom it is assessed or a statement that it is assessed to unknown owners if such is the fact.

(c) The amount then due on the property.

(d) A notice that the property assessed will be sold on the date therein stated in front of the county courthouse to pay the amount then due on the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Sale for Nonpayment [46755. - 46761.]

46755.

The date of the sale of assessed property shall not be less than 10 days after the date of the last publication of the notice of sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

46756.

At the time stated in the notice, or such other time to which the sale may have been postponed, the county treasurer shall sell the property to the highest bidder for lawful money of the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

46757.

Out of the proceeds of sale, the county treasurer shall deposit the amount due on the property as shown in the notice in the proper fund of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

46758.

The county treasurer shall pay to the owner of the property any surplus remaining after the deposit to the credit of the district, after first deducting any expense of sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

46759.

Except where bonds have been issued upon an assessment, the board may direct the county treasurer to postpone the sale from time to time, for not less than 10 nor more than 30 days at one time, by a written notice posted at the place of sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

46759.5.

Except where bonds have been issued upon an assessment, the board of directors may, by resolution filed with the county treasurer of the affected county on or before the time for the sale, order the treasurer to sell all the property to the district for the amount due. Upon receipt of the resolution the treasurer shall, at the time and place of the sale, post a notice that no sale will be held in front of the county courthouse and that the property is sold to the district in accordance with the terms of the resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1086.)
-------------------------------------------

46760.

Upon filing of a resolution pursuant to Section 46759.5 or if no bid is made for the property equal to the amount due thereon, the property shall be sold to the district for the amount due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1086.)
-------------------------------------------

46761.

A certificate of sale shall be executed by the county treasurer to the purchaser, and this certificate of sale shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Redemption [46785. - 46797.]

46785.

Any person interested in property sold for nonpayment of assessments may redeem it at any time within three years after the date of the sale even though the district may be in process of dissolution or may have already been dissolved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

46786.

The redemptioner shall pay to the county treasurer the amount for which the property was sold, interest on the sum at the rate of 9 percent per year from the date of the sale (but not less than three-fourths of 1 percent for any portion of a month), recorder’s fees in recording the certificate of sale and certificate of redemption, and costs of publication required by Section 46730. The amount shall be credited to the proper fund of the district or paid to the person holding the certificate of sale to the property sought to be redeemed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 793, Sec. 3.   Effective September 18, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

46788.

If no redemption is made within three years from the date of sale, the purchaser or the district, if the property shall have been sold to the district, or the assignees or transferees of the district, shall be entitled to a deed executed by the county treasurer even though the district may be in the process of dissolution or may have already been dissolved, after having made demand upon the county treasurer as required by Section 46788.1 and after the county treasurer has given the notice required by Section 46788.1. The right of redemption shall terminate upon recording of the deed to the property.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 793, Sec. 5.   Effective September 18, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

46788.1.

After receiving a demand for a deed pursuant to Section 46788, and not less than 45 days nor more than 60 days before delivery of a deed pursuant to that demand, the county treasurer shall publish once a week for two consecutive weeks in each affected county a notice which shall contain all of the following:

(a) The date of the notice.

(b) A statement that as of a stated date, three years or more will have elapsed since the property or properties described in the notice were sold pursuant to this
 chapter.

(c) A statement that on the stated date, the purchaser demanded delivery of a deed to the property.

(d) A statement that unless sooner redeemed, a deed to the property will be delivered to the purchaser.

(e) The date and time at which the deed will be executed and delivered.

(f) A statement that if the deed is executed and delivered, the right of redemption will terminate.

(g) The name, address, and telephone number of the official who will furnish all information concerning redemption.

(h) The fiscal year or years for which the delinquent assessments were levied. 

(i) A description of the property.

(j) The amount required to redeem, which shall include the amount specified in Section 46788.3.

(k) The name of the assessee on the current assessment book of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 793, Sec. 6.   Effective September 18, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

46788.2.

After the first publication of the notice required by Section 46788.1, and not less than 45 days nor more than 60 days before the date specified in that notice for the delivery of a deed, the county treasurer, or the district, if it was the purchaser, shall send by certified mail to each of the parties of interest, as specified in this section, at his or her last known address, a copy of the notice published pursuant to Section 46788.1. The county treasurer, or the district, if it was the purchaser, shall make a reasonable effort to ascertain the names and addresses of each of the parties of interest. For the purposes of this
 section, a “party of interest” is the holder of any interest in the delinquent property which would be terminated by execution and delivery of a deed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 793, Sec. 7.   Effective September 18, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

46788.3.

Upon first publication of the notice required by Section 46788.1, there shall be added to the amount to redeem as provided in Section 46786 the sum of the following:

(a) The cost of publication of the notice required by Section 46788.1.

(b) The cost of ascertaining the parties of interest, including the cost of any title reports.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 793, Sec. 8.   Effective September 18, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

46789.

The effect of the deed shall be to convey the property free and clear of all liens and encumbrances except state, county, and municipal taxes, assessments or taxes levied or assessed by or under statutory authority, and any district assessment or portion thereof remaining unpaid at the date of the sale, each installment of which may be called and collected as provided in this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

46790.

In any district having no outstanding bonds issued prior to September 15, 1935, any parcel of land heretofore deeded to the district by the county treasurer, as provided in this division, the title to which still remains in the district, and any parcel of land which is hereafter deeded to the district by the county treasurer may, without notice, be sold and conveyed by the board at private sale to the owner of record at the date of the treasurer’s deed to the district or to the owner’s successor in interest, upon his paying to the district the amount for which the same was struck off to the district with interest thereon at the rate of 7 percent per year from the date of
 the delinquent sale, together with any call that has been made upon any prior or subsequent assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

46791.

The deed executed by the district shall convey the property free and clear of all liens and encumbrances, except as provided in this article for a deed by the county treasurer to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

46792.

The district may sell property deeded to it for nonpayment of assessments at any time at a public auction after notice given for the same period and in the same manner as provided in Article 4 of this chapter for sale of delinquent assessments. The district shall have the right to reject any or all bids.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1086.)
-------------------------------------------

46793.

The deed executed by the district shall convey the property free from all encumbrances except as provided in this article for a deed by the county treasurer to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

46794.

The district may also dispose of property acquired by it for nonpayment of assessments at a private sale, without any notice, when the district is in the process of dissolution and such sale is deemed for the best interests of the district. The consideration received from such sale may be past or present consideration, but shall not be less than the sum for which the property was sold to the district with interest at 7 percent per year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

46795.

In any case where a district in the process of dissolution has sold and transferred any of its property at such a private sale prior to August 14, 1931, for valuable consideration, such sale and transfer is hereby validated and approved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

46796.

Any action or proceeding, based on the alleged invalidity or irregularity of a deed executed by the county treasurer to the district or based on the alleged ineffectiveness of the deed to convey the absolute title to the property described in it, may be commenced only within 180 days after the recordation of the deed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 779, Sec. 11.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

46797.

An action or proceeding based on the alleged invalidity or irregularity of any agreement of sale, deed, lease, or option executed by a district in connection with land deeded to it by the county treasurer or based on the alleged ineffectiveness of the instrument to convey or affect the title to the land described in it may be commenced only within 180 days after the execution of the instrument by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 779, Sec. 12.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Supplementary Assessments for Completion of Project [46900. - 46951.]



  ARTICLE 1. Levy [46900. - 46907.]

46900.

“Supplementary assessment”, as used in this chapter, means an assessment, in addition to the original assessment, for the purpose of raising an additional sum for the district project or any unit or combination of units of the project.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 830.)
-------------------------------------------

46901.

If the original assessment for the project or any unit or combination of units thereof is insufficient to provide for the completion of the project or of a unit or combination of units, the board shall levy and collect supplementary assessments to cover the estimated cost of completion.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 830.)
-------------------------------------------

46902.

Each supplementary assessment shall be apportioned among the different tracts of land in the proportion which the amounts assessed against the tracts by the original assessment or assessments bear to one another.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 830.)
-------------------------------------------

46903.

The supplementary assessment shall be made by order entered in the minutes of the board stating the total amount necessary to be raised and fixing the rate of assessment, which shall be the percentage of the total amount assessed by the original assessment or assessments required to produce the amount necessary to be raised.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 830.)
-------------------------------------------

46904.

Upon making the assessment order, the board shall prepare a supplementary assessment roll showing all the following:

(a) A description of each tract assessed.

(b) The amount assessed against each tract by the original assessment or assessments.

(c) The rate of assessment.

(d) The exact amount assessed against each tract by the supplementary assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 830.)
-------------------------------------------

46905.

Upon completion of the supplementary assessment roll, the board shall file with the county treasurer of each affected county a copy of so much of the assessment roll as pertains to land within that county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

46906.

Upon the filing of the assessment roll with the county treasurer, the supplementary assessment constitutes a lien upon each tract shown to be assessed by the copy of the assessment roll so filed for the amount assessed against it. The lien is of the same character and has the same incidents as the lien of the original assessment or assessments.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 830.)
-------------------------------------------

46907.

At any time within 60 days from the filing of the copy of the assessment roll with the county treasurer, it may be amended by the board to correct errors, either on its own initiative or at the instance of any landowner affected. The amendment shall be made by endorsement upon the assessment roll by the county treasurer upon the certification of the error to him by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Collection [46930. - 46930.]

46930.

The supplementary assessment shall be collected in the manner provided for the collection of original assessments, and the board may call the assessment as a whole or in installments from time to time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Additional Property or Work [46950. - 46951.]

46950.

The board may determine upon the acquisition of property or the construction of work not contemplated in the report and recommendation, with accompanying plans and specifications, originally adopted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

46951.

The same proceedings for the preparation and adoption or rejection of the report and recommendation as to the acquisition of additional property or construction of additional work, and in case of the adoption of the report and recommendation, the levying and collection of the assessments to meet the cost, shall be taken in connection with the property and work to be acquired or constructed as provided in this division for the acquisition or construction of the property or work contemplated by the original project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Supplementary Assessments for Maintenance [47100. - 47185.]



  ARTICLE 1. Report and Hearing [47100. - 47105.]

47100.

“Supplementary assessment” as used in this chapter means an assessment, in addition to the original assessment, for the purpose of raising an additional sum for the operation of the district works or for the conduct and management of the district or its works.

(History: Added by Stats, 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

47101.

Whenever after completion of the works of a district in whole or in part it becomes necessary in the opinion of its board to raise any sum for the operation of its works or for the conduct and management of the district or its works, the board shall prepare and adopt a report showing all the following:

(a) The stage to which the works have been completed and paid for.

(b) The sums that will be required for the operation of the works or for the conduct or management of the district or its works.

(c) Any plans and specifications for any work to be done.

(d) An estimate of the aggregate cost of the proposed work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

47102.

The board shall file with the secretary a copy of the report and the plans and specifications, and a notice of the filing of the report stating all the following:

(a) The purpose of the report.

(b) Where the report may be inspected by any person interested.

(c) The time within which protests against the adoption of the report and the levying of any assesment thereunder may be filed.

(d) The time and place when a
 hearing on any protests will be had.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

47103.

The hearings shall be public, and held at the ordinary place of business of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

47104.

At the hearing all protestants shall be permitted to appear in person or by attorney and present their objections to the report.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

47105.

At the conclusion of the hearing, the board may either:

(a) Adopt the report.

(b) Modify the report.

(c) Cause a new report to be made to be again set for hearing as in the first instance.

(d) Abandon, either in whole or in part, the levying of any assessment pursuant to the report.

(e) Determine that the assessment is necessary and make an order of
 supplementary assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Levy [47125. - 47130.]

47125.

The supplementary assessment shall be apportioned among the respective tracts of land in the proportions which the total amounts assessed against the tracts by the original and all subsequent assessments for construction purposes bear to one another.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

47126.

The order making the supplementary assessment shall be entered in the minutes of the board, shall state the total amount necessary to be raised, and shall fix the rate of assessment, which shall be the percentage of the total amount assessed by the original and all subsequent assessments for construction purposes which is required to produce the amount necessary to be raised.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

47127.

Upon making the assessment order, the board shall prepare a supplementary assessment roll showing all the following:

(a) A description of each tract assessed.

(b) The total of assessments against each tract for construction purposes.

(c) The rate of assessment.

(d) The exact amount assessed against each tract by the supplementary assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 461.)
-------------------------------------------

47128.

Upon the completion of the supplementary assessment roll, the board shall file with the county treasurer of each county in which is situated land subject to the assessment, a copy of so much of the assessment roll as pertains to land within that county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

47129.

The supplementary assessment is a lien upon each tract shown to be assessed by the copy of the assessment roll filed with the county treasurer for the amount assessed against it. The lien is of the same character and has the same incidents as the lien of an original assessment for purposes of construction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 391.)
-------------------------------------------

47130.
